Washington statutes.
RCW 41.48.130

Sick leave payments—Accounting plan and payroll procedures.

The director of the office of financial management shall, by January 1, 1980, develop an accounting plan and payroll procedures sufficient to meet the requirements of federal statutes and regulations for the purpose of implementing RCW 41.48.120.

[ 1979 c 152 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 c 152: See note following RCW 41.48.120.